Washington statutes.
RCW 10.66.030

Hearing—Summons.

Upon the filing of an application for an off-limits order under RCW 10.66.020 (1), (2), or (3), the court shall set a hearing fourteen days from the filing of the application, or as soon thereafter as the hearing can be scheduled. If the respondent has not already been served with a summons, the application shall be served on the respondent not less than five court days before the hearing. If timely service cannot be made, the court may set a new hearing date.

[ 1989 c 271 s 216.]